Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4
Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-202, 24-4-205 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401 — 24-4-501, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-514, 24-4-516 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605 — 24-4-619, 24-4-704 — 24-4-707, 24-4-710, 24-4-712, 24-4-714, 24-4-723, 24-4-724, 24-4-726, 24-4-727, 24-4-729, 24-4-732, 24-4-733, 24-4-737, 24-4-739 — 24-4-742, and 24-4-745 — 24-4-747 may not apply to §§ 24-4-108, 24-4-109, 24-4-111,24-4-743 — 24-4-752, 24-4-212, 24-4-801 — 24-4-806, 24-4-901, 24-4-1001 — 24-4-1004, and 24-4-1101 — 24-4-1109 which were enacted subsequently.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 28: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need clarification, standardization, and repeal and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Deferred compensation plans, § 21-5-501 et seq.

Nonteaching public school employees' retirement fund, § 24-7-1101.

Reciprocity of service credits with other retirement systems provided, § 24-2-401 et seq.

Transfer from state employees' retirement system to judicial retirement system, §§ 24-8-214, 24-8-312.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 17: Mar. 7, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a State Employees Retirement System is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled state employees and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the Board of Trustees herein created be appointed, organize and establish the necessary rules and forms to be followed upon the establishment of the retirement system herein created on July 1, 1957. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 42, § 16: Feb. 13, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of county employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled county employees; that the coverage is best obtained by including the county employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that it is necessary for the Board of Trustees of said Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to organize and establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of county employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 64, § 9: Feb. 9, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of municipal employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled municipal employees; that the coverage is best obtained by permitting the inclusion of municipal employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of municipal employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 153, § 15: Mar. 9, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “This act shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 907, § 22: Apr. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1159, § 4: Feb. 11, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some employees who are receiving benefits from local fire and police benefits, have also been making contributions to the Public Employees Retirement System. It is further determined that the law as it presently stands, will not allow benefits to be paid to those employees, upon reaching normal age and service eligibility, as they otherwise would be entitled to. The immediate passage of this Act is therefore necessary in order for the Public Employees Retirement System to be making benefit payments to such employees immediately upon their retirement. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 715, § 9: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Public Retirement laws need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the systems and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 859, § 19: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the system and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 42, § 5: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Public Employees Retirement System law needs to be amended to allow otherwise eligible employees, who are now denied membership in such System because of previous membership in TIAA, to participate in such retirement system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 575, § 3: Mar. 21, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of LOPFI employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled LOPFI employees; that the coverage is best obtained by permitting the inclusion of LOPFI employees in the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of LOPFI employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 7, § 3: Jan. 29, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that only one of the non-State employee members of the Board of Trustees of PERS may be a retired member of the System; that this restriction is obsolete; and that this Act is immediately necessary to allow the filling of a non-State employee vacancy on the Board (which will occur in March 1985) by a non-State employee who is a retired member of PERS. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 461, § 5: Mar. 30, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current retirement law defining employee is unclear; that such should be revised to specifically include prosecuting attorneys of judicial districts; that the purchase of service credit should be expanded for certain employees; that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to preserve the public health, welfare, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 988, § 4: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1159 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 160, § 6: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law is not clear in its meaning and could result in inequities; and that this should be remedied immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 331, § 6: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1991, is essential to the operation of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1991, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 757, § 6: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the state agencies and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 398, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1995, is essential to the operation of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1292, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that employees of Rural Waterworks Facilities Boards created by Act 617 of 1995 should be entitled to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 76, § 10: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention Council of the Tenth Judicial District created by uncodified Act 899 of 1995 should be entitled to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 28: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need clarification, standardization, and repeal and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1137, § 9: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Teacher Retirement System were created to benefit the public employees and the employees of the public educational institutions and school districts of Arkansas; that increases in both the retirement system's asset values allow for increases in systems members' benefits; that most retirements under the Public Employees' Retirement System and the Teacher Retirement System are effective on July 1 and any delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997 will cause an undue hardship in administering this act. Therefore, in order to promote the sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 17: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility, death benefits, and disability benefits, and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 884, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act, this act should become effective on July 1, 1999. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 14: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1299, § 2: Apr. 5, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that there is uncertainty caused by the provision in Arkansas Code 24-4-106 which provides for the elimination of retirement plans by attrition, by issues related to the integration of state and federal retirement laws, and by litigation to interpret the existing law; and that this act is immediately necessary to eliminate uncertainty and to protect the retirement systems, covered employers, and affected employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 799, §
4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the consideration of retirement benefits in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and that the ideal and most efficient time to make revisions to the consideration of retirement benefits is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 616, §
3: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act change the calculation of compensation for retirement purposes and should become effective on July 1, 2009, for consistent application and to avoid confusion; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 20, § 5: Feb. 9, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System currently requires that retirement contributions be based on a member's base salary plus any multipliers; that retirement contributions and benefits should be determined based on a member's base salary and not any multipliers or special salary allowances; and that this act is immediately necessary to clarify the meaning of the term ‘compensation’ for purposes of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 13: Mar. 14, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is vital that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System be permitted to immediately implement policies regarding the termination of employment, eligibility of employees to receive benefits, availability of information, and when to pay interest on employee contributions; and to clarify the meaning of terms in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated to avoid the undue consumption of the system's resources. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 311, § 4: Mar. 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that when a vacancy occurs in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the Governor must be able to immediately appoint a trustee to fill the vacancy; that on the effective date of this act, the provisions of this act should apply to the current members of the board; and that this act shall become effective immediately in order to maintain the stability of the system and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.